Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-913
Substance dependent, defined.

Substance dependent means having a behavioral disorder that involves a maladaptive pattern of repeated use of controlled substances, illegal drugs, or alcohol, usually resulting in increased tolerance, withdrawal, and compulsive using behavior and including a cluster of cognitive, behavioral, and physiological symptoms involving the continued use of such substances despite significant adverse effects resulting from such use.

Laws 1985, LB 252, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1009.02;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 33.